Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2312
Alienage; conditions.

No person is disqualified to take as an heir because he or she or a person through whom he or she claims is or has been an alien except as provided in section 4-107 and under the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 34, UPC § 2-112;

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 3.

Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act, see section 76-3701.